Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB937.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 13952 of Title 16 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes, added May 8, 2024 (P.L.50, No.14), is amended to read:§ 13952. Fees for reports.[The] (a) Fees generally.--Except as provided in subsection (b), the coroner shall charge and collect a fee of $500 for an autopsy report AND ITS ATTACHMENTS, $100 for a toxicology report AND ITS ATTACHMENTS, $100 for an inquisition or coroner's report AND ITS ATTACHMENTS, $50 for a cremation or disposition authorization and other fees as may be established for other reports or documents requested by nongovernmental agencies in order to investigate a claim asserted under a policy of insurance or to determine liability for the death of the <--<--<--1234567891011121314151617 deceased. THE CORONER MAY NOT CHARGE ANY ADDITIONAL FEES FOR PHOTOGRAPHS, ATTACHMENTS OR ANY ADDENDUM TO AN AUTOPSY, TOXICOLOGY OR CORONER'S REPORT.(b) Fees for next-of-kin and guardian of deceased.--The coroner may charge and collect a fee of not more than $100 for an autopsy report, $50 for a toxicology report and $50 for an inquisition or coroner's report requested by the spouse, child, parent, guardian or sibling of the deceased.(c) Accounting for and use of fees collected.--The fees collected under this section shall be accounted for and paid to the county treasurer in accordance with section 14960 (relating to receipts and accounts of money due county) and shall be used to defray the expenses involved in the county complying with the training of coroners or coroner office personnel, as may be required or authorized under this part or any other act.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0937PN1687 - 2 - <--12345678910111213141516